Georgia, session 2025_26, SB11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 5 of Chapter 2 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
service creditable toward retirement benefits, is amended by revising Code Section 47-2-95,
which is designated as reserved, as follows:
"47-2-95.
(a) A member with at least ten years of membership service may obtain up to 36 months
of creditable service to be awarded month for month for active military service in the
armed forces of the United States performed on or after January 1, 1990.
(b) To obtain such creditable service, a member shall:
(1) Apply in a method or manner to be prescribed by the board of trustees;
S. B. 11
- 1 -

LC 56 0215
(2) Submit proof of qualifying active military service as the board of trustees shall deem
necessary; and
(3) Pay to the board of trustees an amount determined by such board to be equal to the
full actuarial cost of such creditable service.
(c) Following its approval of an application for creditable service pursuant to this Code
section, the board of trustees shall certify to the applicant the amount of the payment to the
retirement system required to earn creditable service pursuant to this Code section.
(d) A member may make a one-time payment of the full amount established by the board
of trustees pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section within 90 days and thereafter
receive such creditable service to which he or she is entitled or may elect to participate in
a payment plan under the same terms provided for in subsection (e) of Code
Section 47-2-101.
(e) Pursuant to this Code section, no member shall receive creditable service:
(1) If such member was not honorably discharged;
(2) For reserve duty;
(3) For any period of time for which he or she obtained membership service; or
(4) For any portion of such member's active military service in the armed forces of the
United States that has been or will be used in the determination of eligibility for
retirement benefits or allowances from any other state or federal retirement program,
excluding social security. Reserved."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, only if it is determined to have been
concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, the "Public Retirement Systems Standards Law"; otherwise, this Act shall not
become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2026, as
required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.
S. B. 11
- 2 -

LC 56 0215
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 11
- 3 -